Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
CHAPTER 5 Georgia Public Safety Training Center

Cross references.

Procedure for passing stationary authorized emergency vehicles, stationary towing or recovery vehicles, or stationary highway maintenance vehicles, §

40-6-16

.

Law reviews.

For article, “HB 479: Repeal of Georgia’s Citizen’s Arrest Law,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 25 (2021).

35-5-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Public Safety Training Center Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 429, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35.

Cross references.

Use of retired unmarked pursuit cars for training, §

35-2-57

.

35-5-2.
Board authorized to establish, operate, and maintain center; powers of board as to selection and compensation of administrator.

The Board of Public Safety is authorized:

To establish, operate, and maintain the Georgia Public Safety Training Center for the purpose of providing facilities and programs for the training of state and local law enforcement officers, firefighters, correctional personnel, emergency medical personnel, behavioral health co-responders, and others; and

To do all things and take any action necessary to accomplish such purpose, including, but not limited to, the promulgation of rules and regulations relative thereto.

The board is authorized and directed to select a site for the center.

The board shall select the administrator of the center and establish the compensation for the administrator.

As used in this chapter, the term “emergency medical personnel” includes emergency medical technicians or emergency rescue specialists who are certified or seeking certification as emergency medical technicians, paramedics, tactical emergency medical officers, cardiac technicians, or other medical first responders under Chapter 11 of Title 31 and who are employed in the capacity for which they are certified or seeking certification.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 429, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1057, § 1/SB 581; Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 4-4/HB 1013.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “behavioral health co-responders,” near the end of paragraph (a)(1).

35-5-3.
Assignment to Department of Public Safety for administrative purposes; authorization to solicit and accept gifts, grants, donations, property, and services.

The center is assigned to the Department of Public Safety for administrative purposes only as prescribed in Code Section 50-4-3.

The board is authorized to solicit and accept gifts, grants, donations, property, both real and personal, and services for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 429, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35.

Cross references.

Use of retired unmarked pursuit cars for training, §

35-2-57

.

35-5-4.
Powers and duties of administrator.

The administrator of the center shall select the necessary staff and shall administer the policies and programs of the board regarding the center. The administrator shall be responsible to the board for the management and operation of the center and shall report directly to the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 429, § 3.

Cross references.

Use of retired unmarked pursuit cars for training, §

35-2-57

.

35-5-5.
Center available for use by certain personnel; fees; enrollment; authorization for expenditure of funds; powers and duties.

Subject to such rules and regulations as shall be prescribed by the board, the facilities of the center may be made available to all state and local law enforcement officers, firefighters, emergency medical personnel, and correctional personnel and may also be made available to other persons who evidence interest in entering the fields of law enforcement, fire fighting, emergency medical services, or corrections.

The board is authorized to prescribe and collect such fees as are necessary to defray all or a portion of the cost of furnishing such training and the use of the facilities of the center.

The state and counties and municipalities of this state are authorized to expend funds for the purpose of paying the fees assessed for use of the center. The board shall have the authority to determine who shall be allowed to enroll and participate in the training programs of the center and who shall be allowed to utilize the facilities of the center.

Subject to such rules and regulations as shall be prescribed by the board, the Georgia Public Safety Training Center shall have the following powers and duties in connection with the training of peace officers, emergency medical personnel, behavioral health co-responders, and law enforcement support personnel:

To train instructors authorized to conduct training of peace officers, emergency medical personnel, behavioral health co-responders, and law enforcement support personnel;

To reimburse or provide for certain costs incurred in training peace officers, emergency medical personnel, behavioral health co-responders, and law enforcement support personnel employed or appointed by each agency, organ, or department of this state, counties, and municipalities to the extent that funds are appropriated for such purpose by the General Assembly. In the event sufficient funds are not appropriated for a fiscal year to fund the full cost provided for in this paragraph, then the amount which would otherwise be payable shall be reduced pro rata on the basis of the funds actually appropriated. As used in this paragraph, the terms “cost” and “costs” shall not include travel or salaries of personnel undergoing training and shall be limited exclusively to the cost of tuition which is incurred in connection with such training;

To reimburse or provide for certain costs incurred in training active duty, retired, or honorably discharged members of the United States armed forces who are attending basic law enforcement training, as outlined in subsection (a) of Code Section 35-8-9, to the extent that funds are appropriated for such purpose by the General Assembly. In the event sufficient funds are not appropriated for a fiscal year to fund the full cost provided for in this paragraph, then the amount which would otherwise be payable shall be reduced pro rata on the basis of the funds actually appropriated. As used in this paragraph, the terms “cost” and “costs” shall not include travel or salaries of service members undergoing training and shall be limited exclusively to the cost of tuition which is incurred in connection with such training if such cost or costs are not covered by any other resource available to such service member. Each active duty, retired, or honorably discharged service member undergoing this training shall have complied with the requirements set forth in Code Section 35-8-8;

To expend funds appropriated or otherwise available to the center for paying the costs of training provided under subsection (a) of Code Section 35-8-20, other than travel expenses and salaries of police chiefs or department heads of law enforcement units and wardens of state institutions undergoing training, and shall expend such funds for purposes of compensating a training officer to administer the course of training and conduct any business associated with the training provisions of said Code Section 35-8-20;

To expend funds appropriated or otherwise available to the center for paying the costs of training provided for under subsection (a) of Code Section 35-8-20.1, other than travel expenses and salaries of police chiefs or department heads of law enforcement units undergoing training, and shall expend such funds for purposes of compensating a training officer to administer the course of training and conduct any business associated with the training provisions of said Code Section 35-8-20.1;

To expend funds appropriated or otherwise available to the center for paying the costs of training provided for under Chapter 11 of Title 31 for the initial certification training and continued training as needed by emergency medical personnel and shall expend such funds for purposes of compensating a training officer to administer the course of training and conduct any business associated with the training provisions of said chapter; and

To administer and coordinate the training for communications officers with respect to the requirements of Code Section 35-8-23. The board shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to facilitate the administration and coordination of training consistent with the provisions of said Code Section 35-8-23. The tuition costs of the training of communications officers shall be paid from funds appropriated to the center.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 429, § 5; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1488, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1057, § 2/SB 581; Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 4-5/HB 1013; Ga. L. 2022, p. 107, § 1/SB 358.

The 2022 amendments.

The first 2022 amendment, effective July 1, 2022, inserted “behavioral health co-responders,” following “emergency medical personnel” in the introductory language of subsection (d), and in paragraphs (d)(1) and (d)(2). The second 2022 amendment, effective July 1, 2022, substituted “tuition which is” for “tuition, meals, and lodging which are” in the last sentence in paragraph (d)(2), added paragraph (d)(3), and redesignated former paragraphs (d)(3) through (d)(6) as present paragraphs (d)(4) through (d)(7), respectively.

Cross references.

Use of retired unmarked pursuit cars for training, §

35-2-57

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2022, a semicolon was substituted for a comma at the end of paragraph (d)(3).

35-5-6.
Effect of chapter on powers of Board of Corrections, State Board of Pardons and Paroles, and Technical College System of Georgia.

Nothing in this chapter shall be considered as altering current state laws establishing the powers and authority of the Board of Corrections or the State Board of Pardons and Paroles. Furthermore, nothing in this chapter shall prevent the Technical College System of Georgia from providing any course of instruction including, but not limited to, instructional courses, certified training, advanced instruction, or classes for or pertaining to public safety first responders and emergency medical personnel.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 429, § 6; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1057, § 3/SB 581; Ga. L. 2008, p. 335, § 5/SB 435.

35-5-7.
Security police force.

The administrator of the center, with the approval of the board, is authorized to establish a security police force within the Georgia Public Safety Training Center.

While in the performance of their duties on property of the Georgia Public Safety Training Center, such security police shall have the same law enforcement powers, including the power of arrest, as a law enforcement officer of the local government with police jurisdiction over such Georgia Public Safety Training Center.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-5-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 317, § 2.